test/src/morphology/N-pada_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pada: # Noun 'pot / pata' - full paradigm
     pada+N+Sg+Nom: pada
     pada+N+Sg+Gen: puan
     pada+N+Sg+Acc: [pada, puan]
     pada+N+Sg+Par: padua
     pada+N+Sg+Tra: puakse
     pada+N+Sg+Abe: [puatta, puata, puattah]
     pada+N+Sg+Com: puanke
     pada+N+Sg+Ine: puas
     pada+N+Sg+Ela: [puaspäi, puas]
     pada+N+Sg+Ill: padah
     pada+N+Sg+Ade: pual
     pada+N+Sg+Abl: [pualpäi, pual]
     pada+N+Sg+All: puale
     pada+N+Sg+Ess: puannu
     pada+N+Sg+Ter: puassah
     pada+N+Sg+Apr: pualluo
     pada+N+Pl+Nom: puat
     pada+N+Pl+Gen: padojen
     pada+N+Pl+Acc: puat
     pada+N+Pl+Par: padoi
     pada+N+Pl+Tra: padoikse
     pada+N+Pl+Abe: [padoitta, padoita, padoittah]
     pada+N+Pl+Com: padojenke
     pada+N+Pl+Ine: padois
     pada+N+Pl+Ela: [padoispäi, padois]
     pada+N+Pl+Ill: padoih
     pada+N+Pl+Ade: padoil
     pada+N+Pl+Abl: [padoilpäi, padoil]
     pada+N+Pl+All: padoile
     pada+N+Pl+Ess: padoinnu
     pada+N+Pl+Ins: padoin
     pada+N+Pl+Apr: padojelluo
     pada+N+Sg+Nom+Clt/gi: padagi
     pada+N+Sg+Gen+Clt/gi: puangi
     pada+N+Sg+Acc+Clt/gi: [padagi, puangi]
     pada+N+Sg+Par+Clt/gi: paduagi
     pada+N+Sg+Tra+Clt/gi: puaksegi
     pada+N+Sg+Abe+Clt/gi: [puattagi, puatagi, puattahgi]
     pada+N+Sg+Com+Clt/gi: puankegi
     pada+N+Sg+Ine+Clt/gi: puasgi
     pada+N+Sg+Ela+Clt/gi: [puaspäigi, puasgi]
     pada+N+Sg+Ill+Clt/gi: padahgi
     pada+N+Sg+Ade+Clt/gi: pualgi
     pada+N+Sg+Abl+Clt/gi: [pualpäigi, pualgi]
     pada+N+Sg+All+Clt/gi: pualegi
     pada+N+Sg+Ess+Clt/gi: puannugi
     pada+N+Sg+Ter+Clt/gi: puassahgi
     pada+N+Sg+Apr+Clt/gi: pualluogi
     pada+N+Pl+Nom+Clt/gi: puatgi
     pada+N+Pl+Gen+Clt/gi: padojengi
     pada+N+Pl+Acc+Clt/gi: puatgi
     pada+N+Pl+Par+Clt/gi: padoigi
     pada+N+Pl+Tra+Clt/gi: padoiksegi
     pada+N+Pl+Abe+Clt/gi: [padoittagi, padoitagi, padoittahgi]
     pada+N+Pl+Com+Clt/gi: padojenkegi
     pada+N+Pl+Ine+Clt/gi: padoisgi
     pada+N+Pl+Ela+Clt/gi: [padoispäigi, padoisgi]
     pada+N+Pl+Ill+Clt/gi: padoihgi
     pada+N+Pl+Ade+Clt/gi: padoilgi
     pada+N+Pl+Abl+Clt/gi: [padoilpäigi, padoilgi]
     pada+N+Pl+All+Clt/gi: padoilegi
     pada+N+Pl+Ess+Clt/gi: padoinnugi
     pada+N+Pl+Ins+Clt/gi: padoingi
     pada+N+Pl+Apr+Clt/gi: padojelluogi
